Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB758.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13(g) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended to read:Section 13. Prohibited Acts; Penalties.--* * *(g) Any person who violates clause (31) of subsection (a) is guilty of a [misdemeanor] summary offense and upon conviction thereof shall be [sentenced to imprisonment not exceeding thirty days, or] ordered to pay a fine not exceeding [five hundred dollars ($500), or both] twenty-five dollars ($25).12345678910111213141516171819202122 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0758PN0782 - 2 - 12